District of Columbia statutes.
36-303.07

Application of subchapter.

(a)

This subchapter shall only apply to that portion of a marketing agreement which concerns the operation of a retail service station which is located within the District of Columbia and only to the extent of the business conducted by a retail dealer within the District of Columbia.

(b)

This subchapter shall apply to any and all marketing agreements entered into after April 19, 1977. The term “entered into” shall include any renewal, extension, modification, amendment, or novation of a preexisting marketing agreement.

(c)

This subchapter shall also apply to any failure to renew a preexisting marketing agreement.

Apr. 19, 1977, D.C. Law 1-123, § 4-207, 24 DCR 2371
1981 Ed., § 10-227.
1973 Ed., § 10-227.